Maryland, session 2025, HB1356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
5–202.
(H) (1) A DISTRICT COURT COMMISSIONER MAY NOT AUTHORIZE THE
PRETRIAL RELEASE OF A DEFENDANT ON PERSONAL RECOGNIZANCE OR
UNSECURED BAIL IF THE DEFENDANT HAS PREVIOUSLY:
(I) BEEN CHARGED WITH COMMITTING A CRIME FOR WHICH
THE DEFENDANT WAS RELEASED ON UNSECURED BAIL WITHIN THE PREVIOUS 5
YEARS; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1356*

HOUSE BILL 1356
(II) FAILED TO APPEAR IN COURT AS REQUIRED WHILE
RELEASED ON UNSECURED BAIL.
(2) A JUDGE MAY AUTHORIZE THE PRETRIAL RELEASE OF A
DEFENDANT DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON:
(I) SECURED BAIL; AND
(II) ANY OTHER CONDITIONS THAT WILL REASONABLY ENSURE
THAT THE DEFENDANT WILL NOT FLEE OR POSE A DANGER TO ANOTHER PERSON OR
THE COMMUNITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.